Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 11. Suits on Performance Bonds.

§§ 85-7-181 through 85-7-185.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 487, § 24, effective upon approval April 11, 2014.

§85-7-181. [Codes, 1880, § 1381; 1892, § 2714; 1906, § 3074; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2434; 1930, § 2274; 1942, § 372; Laws, 1904, ch. 153; Laws, 1918, ch. 128; Laws, 1987, ch. 392, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 372, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010.]

§85-7-183. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434a; 1930, § 2275; 1942, § 373; Laws, 1918, ch. 128.]

§85-7-185. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434b; 1930, § 2276; 1942, § 374; Laws, 1918, ch. 128; Laws, 2010, ch. 372, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 357, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.]

§ 85-7-187.
Bond; persons with right of action.

If only a performance bond has been provided in accordance with this chapter and if no suit shall be brought by the obligee within six (6) months from the date of the earlier of final completion or actual use or occupancy of the project for its intended purpose, then any person supplying labor or materials to the bond principal on the project shall have a right of action on said bond for his use and benefit against said bond principal and the sureties thereon and to prosecute same to final judgment and execution, subject to the rights and demands of the bond obligee.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434c; 1930, § 2277; 1942, § 375; Laws, 1918, ch. 128; Laws, 2005, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 85-7-189.
Bond; suit on; commencement.

Suit on a performance claim by an obligee on a bond given in accordance with this chapter shall be commenced as follows:

If the obligee is the owner of the project being constructed, such obligee shall bring suit within one (1) year after the earlier of final completion or actual use or occupancy of the project for its intended purpose; or

If the obligee is other than an owner of the project being constructed, such obligee shall bring suit within one (1) year after such obligee receives final payment with respect to the project.

When suit is instituted on a claim for payment on a payment bond given in accordance with this chapter, it shall be commenced within one (1) year after the day on which the last of the labor was performed or material or rental or lease equipment was supplied by the person bringing the action and not later.

Any suit on a bond given in accordance with this chapter shall be brought in the county in which the contract or some part thereof was performed or in the county in which service of process may be obtained upon either the principal or the surety on such bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434d; 1930, § 2278; 1942, § 376; Laws, 1918, ch. 128; Laws, 1994, ch. 626, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 461, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 85-7-191.
Bond; suit on; only one action permitted; intervention.

If only a performance bond is given in accordance with this chapter and if suit is instituted on said performance bond only one (1) action shall be brought for performance and payment claims and any person entitled to sue may upon application intervene and be made a party to said suit and such intervention must occur within the time limited for such person to bring an original action; provided, however, if a separate payment bond is given then only one (1) separate action for payment claims shall likewise be brought on the payment bond and intervention shall be allowed in accordance with this statute.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434e; 1930, § 2279; 1942, § 377; Laws, 1918, ch. 128; Laws, 2005, ch. 461, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 85-7-193.
Bond: judgment; pro rata recovery where funds insufficient.

If only a performance bond is given in accordance with this chapter and the recovery on the performance bond should be inadequate to pay the full amount found due including amounts due the obligee, judgment shall be given after the performance bond obligee is fully satisfied for all its claims, demands, rights and damages to each person, including reasonable attorney’s fees in an amount to be set by the judge, pro rata of the amount of the recovery. The surety on said performance bond may pay into court for distribution the full amount of its liability, less any amount which may have been paid to the performance bond obligee by reason of the execution of said bond, and upon so doing the surety will be relieved from further liability.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434f; 1930, § 2280; 1942, § 378; Laws, 1918, ch. 128; Laws, 1987, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 461, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 85-7-195.
Process.

To all suits instituted under the provisions of this chapter the parties interested shall be summoned as provided by Section 85-7-145; provided further that where any contractors’ bond has been executed and delivered under any of the foregoing sections of this chapter and the contractor or principal obligor in said bond, or any one or more of said principal obligors therein shall be a non-resident or shall remove from the state, or so conceal himself therein that service of process cannot be directly made upon him personally, then in such case personal service of summons for said absent or absconding principal obligor may be made upon the insurance commissioner of the State of Mississippi in like manner, with the same procedure thereabout, and with the same effect as process may be served on said commissioner in cases of a defendant foreign insurance company; and the delivery of any such bond within this state shall be deemed equivalent to the appointment, by the principal obligors and by the surety or sureties therein, of the state insurance commissioner or his successors in office to be the true and lawful attorney of said obligors upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action or proceeding arising under said bond when for any one of the reasons aforesaid the said principal obligors or any one of them cannot be otherwise served with personal summons in this state, and the delivery of any bond in this chapter mentioned shall be a signification of the agreement and power of attorney of the said principal obligor or obligors and of said sureties that any such process against said principal or principals which is so served shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon the said principal or principals personally.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2434g; 1930, § 2281; 1942, § 379; Laws, 1918, ch. 128.

§§ 85-7-197 through 85-7-201.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 487, § 24, effective upon approval April 11, 2014.

§85-7-197. [Codes, 1930, § 2282; 1942, § 380; Laws, 1928, ch. 136; Laws, 1984, ch. 319, eff from and after July 1, 1984..]

§85-7-199. [Codes, 1930, § 2283; 1942, § 381; Laws, 1928, ch. 136.]

§85-7-201. [Codes, 1930, § 2284; 1942, § 382; Laws, 1928, ch. 136.]